Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1303
Government, Military and Veterans Affairs Committee; conduct evaluation.

(1) The Government, Military and Veterans Affairs Committee of the Legislature may randomly select and conduct an evaluation of any board, commission, or similar entity. An evaluation conducted by the committee shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A review of the basic assumptions underlying the creation of the board, commission, or entity;

(b) A statement of the impact and effectiveness of the programs, policies, services, or activities administered by, or under the supervision of, the board, commission, or entity; and

(c) A recommendation as to whether the board, commission, or entity should be terminated, continued, or modified.

(2) If the committee believes that a more extensive evaluation of a board, commission, or entity is necessary, the chairperson of the committee, on the committee's behalf, may request the Legislative Oversight Committee to conduct a performance audit pursuant to the Legislative Performance Audit Act. Nothing in this section shall be construed to give requests for performance audits under this section priority over other requests under consideration by the Legislative Oversight Committee.

Laws 1999, LB 298, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 607, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 95.

Legislative Performance Audit Act, see section 50-1201.